src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexd
PATTERN Noun_Possession
# Noun Class I
Class_I [<N><Sg>:]
Class_I [<N>:] Pluralizer

# Noun Class II
:Abreviated_Determiner :Set_A Class_II [<N><Sg>:] Abreviated_Determiner: Set_A:
:Set_A Class_II [<N><Sg>:] Set_A:
:Set_A Class_II [<N>:] Set_A: Pluralizer
:Abreviated_Determiner :Set_A Class_II [<N>:] Abreviated_Determiner: Set_A: Pluralizer
Class_II: [<N><Sg>:] :Class_II
Class_II: [<N>:] :Class_II Pluralizer

# Noun Class III
:Set_A Class_III [<N><Sg>:] Set_A:
:Set_A Class_III [<N>:] Set_A: Pluralizer
:Abreviated_Determiner :Set_A Class_III [<N><Sg>:] Abreviated_Determiner: Set_A:
:Abreviated_Determiner :Set_A Class_III [<N>:] Abreviated_Determiner: Set_A: Pluralizer
Class_III [<N><Sg>:] [<Unposs>:{B}{B}ej]
Class_III [<N>:] [<Unposs>:{B}{B}ej] Pluralizer
Class_III [<N><Sg>:]
Class_III [<N>:] Pluralizer

# Noun Class IV
:Set_A Class_IV [<N><Sg>:] Set_A: [<Hum.Poss>:el]
:Abreviated_Determiner :Set_A Class_IV [<N><Sg>:] Abreviated_Determiner: Set_A: [<Hum.Poss>:el]
:Set_A Class_IV [<N><Sg>:] Set_A: [<Hum.Poss>:el] Pluralizer
:Abreviated_Determiner :Set_A Class_IV [<N><Sg>:] Abreviated_Determiner: Set_A: [<Hum.Poss>:el] Pluralizer
Class_IV [<N><Sg>:] [<Hum.Poss>:el]
Class_IV [<N>:] [<Hum.Poss>:el] Pluralizer
:Set_A Class_IV [<N><Sg>:] Set_A:
:Abreviated_Determiner :Set_A Class_IV [<N><Sg>:] Abreviated_Determiner: Set_A:
:Set_A Class_IV [<N>:] Set_A: Pluralizer
:Abreviated_Determiner :Set_A Class_IV [<N>:] Abreviated_Determiner: Set_A: Pluralizer
Class_IV [<N>:] Pluralizer
